Washington statutes.
RCW 16.08.040

Dog bites—Liability.

(1) The owner of any dog which shall bite any person while such person is in or on a public place or lawfully in or on a private place including the property of the owner of such dog, shall be liable for such damages as may be suffered by the person bitten, regardless of the former viciousness of such dog or the owner's knowledge of such viciousness.

(2) This section does not apply to the lawful application of a police dog, as defined in RCW 4.24.410.

[ 2012 c 94 s 1; 1941 c 77 s 1; Rem. Supp. 1941 s 3109-1.]